Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.1953

Gross vehicle weight rating.

"Gross vehicle weight rating" means the value specified by the manufacturer as the maximum load weight of a single vehicle.

[ 2010 c 161 s 118.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.